Hawaii statutes.
[Chapter 551G]

UNIFORM
ADULT GUARDIANSHIP AND PROTECTIVE PROCEEDINGS JURISDICTION ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

551G-1 Short title

551G-2 Definitions

551G-3 International application

551G-4 Communication between courts

551G-5 Cooperation between courts

551G-6 Taking testimony in another state

Part II. Jurisdiction

551G-11 Definitions; significant factors

551G-12 Exclusive basis

551G-13 Jurisdiction

551G-14 Special jurisdiction

551G-15 Exclusive and continuing jurisdiction

551G-16 Appropriate forum

551G-17 Jurisdiction declined by reason of
conduct

551G-18 Notice of proceeding

551G-19 Proceedings in more than one state

Part III.
Transfer of Guardianship or Conservatorship

551G-21 Transfer of guardianship or
conservatorship to

another state

551G-22 Accepting guardianship or conservatorship

transferred from another state

Part IV. Registration and Recognition of Orders From

Other States

551G-31 Registration of guardianship orders

551G-32 Registration of protective orders

551G-33 Effect of registration

Part V. Miscellaneous Provisions

551G-41 Uniformity of application and
construction

551G-42 Relation to Electronic Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

Revision Note

Sections 551G-7 to 551G-22 were renumbered as §§551G-11 to
551G-42, pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next